Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. General Provisions.
Sec. 14.03.120.
Education planning; reports.

A district shall annually file with the department, and make available to the public, a report that

establishes district goals and priorities for improving education in the district;

includes a plan for achieving district goals and priorities; and

includes a means of measuring the achievement of district goals and priorities.

The department shall summarize the reports submitted under (a) of this section and include all revenue received by each school district organized in easily sortable categories including ADM and district, as a statewide report, provide a copy to the governor, publish the report on the department’s Internet website, and notify the legislature that the report is available; in this subsection, “revenue” means all money reported to the department as receipts from any source, including state, federal, local, special, and other funding.

A district shall make efforts to encourage students, parents, teachers, and other members of the community to participate in the preparation of the report submitted under (a) of this section.

Annually, before the date set by the district under (e) of this section, each public school shall deliver to the department for posting on the department’s Internet website and provide, in a public meeting of parents, students, and community members, a report on the school’s performance and the performance of the school’s students. The report shall be prepared on a form prescribed by the department and must include

information on accreditation;

results of norm-referenced achievement tests;

results of state standards-based assessments in language arts and mathematics;

a description, including quantitative and qualitative measures, of student, parent, community, and business involvement in student learning;

a description of the school’s attendance, retention, dropout, and graduation rates as specified by the state board;

the annual percent of enrollment change, regardless of reason, and the annual percent of enrollment change due to student transfers into and out of the school district;

if Native language education is provided, a summary and evaluation of the curriculum described in AS

14.30.420

;

the performance designation assigned the school under AS

14.03.123

and the methodology used to assign the performance designation, including the measures used and their relative weights;

other information concerning school performance and the performance of the school’s students as required by the state board in regulation; and

information on the number, attendance, and performance of students enrolled in the school whose parents or guardians are on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, the United States Coast Guard, the Alaska National Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, or the Alaska State Defense Force.

By a date set by the district, each public school in the district shall provide the report described in (d) of this section to the district’s governing body. Along with the report, each public school shall submit a summary of comments made on the report by parents, students, and community members. By July 1 of each year, each district shall provide to the department a report on the performance of each public school and the public school students in the district. The district’s report must

be entitled “School District Report Card to the Public”; and

include

copies of the reports and summaries of comments submitted under this section by each public school in the district;

a compilation of the material described in (A) of this paragraph by each public school in the district;

the designation assigned the district under AS

14.03.123

and the methodology used to assign the performance designation, including the measures used and their relative weights; and

other information concerning school performance and the performance of the school’s students as required by the state board in regulation.

By January 15 of each year, the department shall provide to the governor and make available to the public and the legislature a report on the performance of public schools in this state. The report must be entitled “Alaska’s Public Schools: A Report Card to the Public.” The report must include

comprehensive information on each public school compiled, collected, and reported under (d) and (e) of this section for the prior school year;

a summary of the information described in (1) of this subsection; the summary must be prepared in a manner that allows school performance to be measured against established state education standards; and

the most recent performance designation under AS

14.03.123

received by each public school and by the state public school system.

In this section, “district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 173 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1992; am §§ 7, 8 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 29 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 94 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 2002; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 173 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 3 ch 54 SLA 2016; am § 7 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

For school and district accountability, see 4 AAC 6, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (d)(3), substituted “language arts” for “reading, writing”; in (d)(5), deleted “including the number and percentage of students who received a diploma under a waiver from the competency examination required under AS

14.03.075(a)

,” following “graduation rates”; deleted (d)(8), which related to the number and percentage of students who completed alternative assessments; added (d)(10), and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, in (f)(3), inserted “and by the state public school system” following “public school”.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (f), in the introductory language, deleted “beginning in 2001,” following “By January 15 of each year”, and in (f)(3), deleted “for a report due by or after January 15, 2005,” at the beginning.

Sec. 14.03.123.
School and district accountability.

By September 1 of each year, the department shall assign a performance designation to each public school and school district and to the state public school system in accordance with (f) of this section.

The department shall inform the governing body of each district of the performance designations assigned to the district and to the state public school system under (a) of this section.

The state board shall adopt regulations implementing this section, providing for a statewide student assessment system, and providing for the process of assigning a designation under (a) of this section, including

the methodology used to assign the performance designation, including the measures used and their relative weights;

a comparison of the state public school system to public schools in other states, including a comparison of student participation in standards-based assessments and student performance on the assessments;

high performance and low performance designations that are based on the accountability system under this section;

a procedure for appealing a designation that may be used by the principal of a public school or by the superintendent of a public school district;

additional measures that may be progressively implemented by the commissioner to assist schools or districts to improve performance in accordance with this section; the additional measures may be unique to a certain school or district if that school or district receives federal funding that is not available to all schools or districts in the state.

A public school or district that receives a low performance designation under this section shall prepare and submit to the department a school or district improvement plan, as applicable, in accordance with regulations adopted by the board. The improvement plan must be prepared with the maximum feasible public participation of the community including, as appropriate, interested individuals, teachers, parents, parent organizations, students, tribal organizations, local government representatives, and other community groups. The improvement plan must, to the extent possible, include measures that increase local control of education and parental choice and that do not require a direct increase in state or federal funding for the school or district.

The department shall establish a program of special recognition for those public schools that receive a high performance designation, based on the accountability system under (f) of this section, that demonstrates

an improvement over the school’s performance designation for the previous year; or

maintenance of a proficient or high performance designation from the previous year.

In the accountability system for schools and districts required by this section, the department shall

implement state criteria and priorities for accountability including the use of

measures of student performance on standards-based assessments in language arts and mathematics; the assessments must be selected with the input of teachers and school administrators and minimize disruption to classroom instruction;

measures of student improvement and academic achievement; and

other measures identified that are indicators of student success and achievement; and

to the extent practicable, minimize the administrative burden on districts.

In this section,

“district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

;

“state public school system” means the combination of all public schools, public school districts, and state-operated schools.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1998; am §§ 2, 3 ch 99 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 173 SLA 2004; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 12 SLA 2006; am § 7 ch 15 SLA 2014; am §§ 4 — 8 ch 54 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

For school and district accountability, see 4 AAC 6, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective April 4, 2006, substituted “performance” for “achievement” two times in paragraph (2) of subsection (c), near the beginning of subsection (d), and near the end of subsection (e).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote (f)(2)(A), which read, “measures of student performance on standards-based assessments in reading, writing, and mathematics, and including competency tests required under AS 14.03.75”.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 26, 2016, in (b), substituted “designations” for “designation”, inserted “to the district and to the state public school system” following “assigned”; in (c), added (c)(2), in (c)(5), deleted “and with federal law; to the extent necessary to conform to federal law,” following “with this section”, and made related changes; in (d), added the third sentence; in the introductory language of (e), inserted “, based on the accountability system under (f) of this section, that demonstrates” at the end, added (e)(1) and (2); in (f), deleted former (f)(1) relating to 20 U.S.C. 6301 – 7941, in (f)(1)(A), inserted “the assessments must be selected with the input of teachers and school administrators and minimize disruption to classroom instruction” following “language arts and mathematics”, in (f)(1)(B), inserted “and academic achievement” following “improvement”, and made related changes.

Sec. 14.03.125.
Fund for the improvement of school performance.

The fund for the improvement of school performance is created as an account in the general fund. The fund shall be used by the commissioner to make grants to a district located in the state for the purpose of improving school performance. The fund consists of money appropriated by the legislature. The commissioner shall annually determine the amount requested for grants under this section and shall include the amount in the department’s budget request.

A governing body, district advisory board, or nonprofit organization located in the state, or a teacher or principal employed by a public school in the state, may apply for a grant of up to $50,000 to improve school performance by submitting an application to the commissioner.

A grant may be awarded to the same grantee in consecutive fiscal years, but may not be awarded to the same grantee for more than two fiscal years within a five-year period.

Grant funds awarded under this section may only be expended to improve the performance of a public school.

In this section, “district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 173 SLA 1990; am § 8 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For grants for the improvement of school performance, see 4 AAC 33, art. 2.

Sec. 14.03.126.
Public school performance incentive program. [Repealed, § 8 ch 41 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 14.03.127.
Funding for Internet services.

Each fiscal year, a district in which one or more schools qualify for a discounted rate for Internet services under the federal universal services program is eligible to receive an amount for each school that is equal to the amount needed to bring the applicant’s share to 25 megabits of download a second of the Internet services.

If insufficient funding is appropriated to provide funding authorized under this section, the state share shall be distributed pro rata to eligible school districts.

In this section,

“applicant’s share” means the difference between the cost of Internet services that are eligible for the discount under the federal universal services program and the discount received for those services under the federal universal services program;

“federal universal services program” means the program established in 47 U.S.C. 254 and regulations implementing that section.

History.

(§ 8 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective June 23, 2020, in (a), substituted “25 megabits” for “10 megabits”.

Effective dates. —

Section 62, ch. 15, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.

Sec. 14.03.130.
Display of flags and pledge of allegiance.

United States and Alaska flags shall be displayed upon or near each principal school building during school hours and at other times the governing body considers proper. The governing body shall require that the pledge of allegiance be recited regularly, as determined by the governing body. A person may recite the following salute to the flag of the United States or maintain a respectful silence: “I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America and to the republic for which it stands, one nation under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all.”

A school district shall inform all affected persons at the school of their right not to participate in the pledge of allegiance. The exercise of the right not to participate in the pledge of allegiance may not be used to evaluate a student or employee or for any other purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am §§ 1, 2 ch 7 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

The material in subsection (b), enacted as AS

14.30.130

, was renumbered in 2000 as AS

14.03.130

to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 14.03.140.
Emergency drills.

The principal or other persons in charge of each public or private school or educational institution shall instruct and train pupils by means of drills so that in an emergency they may be able to leave the school building in the shortest possible time without confusion or panic.
Drills shall be held at least once each month during the school term, weather permitting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.03.150.
Property insurance required.

Each school district shall purchase and maintain or provide proof of adequate property insurance for the replacement cost of all school facilities and equipment. Insurance purchased to comply with this section may contain a deductible amount, if approved by the department. A school district may comply with this section by initiating and maintaining a program of self-insurance, if the department annually determines that the school district has submitted adequate evidence of the district’s ability to self-insure for the replacement cost of all school facilities and equipment. A copy of the insurance policy or other information indicating compliance with this section shall be provided to the department.

If the department determines that a school district is not insured as required under (a) of this section, the department shall notify the school district of the determination. Unless the school district obtains adequate insurance within 30 days after the school district receives notice under this subsection, the department shall purchase the insurance required by (a) of this section for that school district.

The department may not award a school construction or major maintenance grant under AS 14.11 to a municipality that is a school district or a regional educational attendance area that is not in compliance with (a) of this section. The department shall reduce the amount of state aid under AS

14.17.400

for which a school district may qualify by the amount, if any, paid by the department under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 5 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 9 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For loss protection, see 4 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 14.03.160.
Suspension or expulsion of students for possessing weapons.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district shall

expel for at least one year a student who violates AS

11.61.210(a)(8)

while possessing a firearm, as that term is defined under 18 U.S.C. 921;

suspend for at least 30 days, or expel for the school year or permanently, a student who violates AS

11.61.210(a)(8)

while possessing a deadly weapon, other than a firearm as that term is defined under 18 U.S.C. 921.

The administrative officer of a school district may on a case-by-case basis reduce or otherwise modify the expulsion or suspension of a student under (a) of this section.

A prior conviction, or adjudication of delinquency or child in need of aid, for violation of AS

11.61.210(a)(8)

is not necessary for a school board to suspend or expel a student under this section.

Each school district shall adopt a policy providing for the

referral to law enforcement authorities of students who violate AS

11.61.210(a)(8)

;

identification of procedures and conditions for early reinstatement of students suspended or expelled under this section.

Annually on a date set by the department, each school district shall report to the department the number of students expelled under this section and the types of weapons involved.

In this section,

“deadly weapon” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 33 SLA 1995; am § 10 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For suspension for other reasons, see AS

14.30.045

.